District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.18

Authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall exercise authority over the Corporation consistent with §§ 1-204.24a through 1-204.24f.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5129, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 107, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “§§ 1-204.24a through 1-204.24f” for “§§ 1-204.24a, 1-204.24b, and 1-204.24c.”